Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7198.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-1-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-1 entitled "General
Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-1-2. Felony, misdemeanor — Petty misdemeanor, and violation distinguished.
(a) Unless otherwise provided, any criminal offense which at any given time may be
punished by imprisonment for a term of more than one year, or by a fine of more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000), is declared to be a felony; any criminal offense which may be punishable by
imprisonment for a term of more than six (6) months and not exceeding one year, or by a fine of
not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, is declared to be three hundred sixty-four
(364) days, or solely by a fine of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, is declared to
be a misdemeanor; any criminal offense which may be punishable by imprisonment for a term not
exceeding six (6) months or solely by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both,
and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) is declared to be a petty misdemeanor; and any
offense which may be punished by only a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) is
declared to be a violation.
(b) Whenever the phrase "one year" appears in any provision of the general or public laws
in reference to the maximum sentence of imprisonment that may be imposed, such phrase shall
mean, be interpreted as, and be applied as three hundred sixty-four (364) days.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
========
LC003856/SUB A
========
LC003856/SUB A - Page 2 of 3